District of Columbia statutes.
23-583

Processing arrests.

Unless a person is not eligible for release under § 23-584, a person shall not be detained pending his or her first appearance before a judicial officer if he or she agrees to appear in court and abide by conditions set pursuant to § 23-584(d)(1), if any.

History

Apr. 24, 2015, D. C. Law 20-243, § 2(a)(4), 61 DCR 8320